Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.081

Oath and bond of officers.

In a city of the second class, the treasurer, city attorney, clerk, chief of police, and such other officers as the council may require shall each, before entering upon the duties of office, take an oath of office and execute and file with the clerk an official bond in such penal sum as the council shall determine, conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties and otherwise conditioned as may be provided by ordinance. The oath of office shall be filed with the county auditor.

[ 1994 c 81 s 37; 1987 c 3 s 10; 1986 c 167 s 18; 1965 c 7 s 35.24.080. Prior: 1915 c 184 s 5; 1893 c 70 s 1; 1890 p 179 s 107; RRS s 9118. Formerly RCW 35.24.080.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 3: See note following RCW 3.70.010.

Severability—1986 c 167: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.